Maine, session 132, LD1679.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §6702, sub-§8 is enacted to read:
8. Scallop dragging license; island communities. The commissioner shall allocate
one scallop dragging license for each of the following island communities to be issued to
an applicant who is a resident of each community:
A. Chebeague Island;
B. Cliff Island;
C. Frenchboro;
D. Great Cranberry Island;
E. Isle au Haut;
F. Islesboro;
G. Islesford;
H. Long Island in Casco Bay;
I. Matinicus Isle;
J. Monhegan;
K. North Haven;
L. Peaks Island;
M. Swan's Island; and
N. Vinalhaven.
A license issued pursuant to this subsection may not be transferred to a resident of an island
community other than the community to which the commissioner allocated the license. If
a license that is allocated for an island community goes unissued for 3 consecutive years,
the commissioner may reallocate that license to another community listed under this
subsection.
The commissioner shall work with the municipal officers of the island communities listed
under this subsection and with relevant local organizations within those communities to
implement and administer this subsection, including verifying applicant residency,
facilitating the allocation of licenses and identifying the need for additional licenses to be
issued as incentives to attract year-round residents.